Hawaii statutes.
[§583A-205] Notice; opportunity to be
heard; joinder. (a) Before a child-custody determination is made under
this chapter, notice and an opportunity to be heard in accordance with the
standards of section 583A-108 must be given to all persons entitled to notice
under the law of this State as in child-custody proceedings between residents
of this State, any parent whose parental rights have not been previously
terminated, and any person having physical custody of the child.

(b) This chapter does not govern the
enforceability of a child-custody determination made without notice or an
opportunity to be heard.

(c) The obligation to join a party and the
right to intervene as a party in a child-custody proceeding under this chapter
are governed by the law of this State as in child-custody proceedings between
residents of this State. [L 2002, c 124, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next